Maryland, session 2025, HB1213.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
13–102.
This title applies only in Baltimore County.
13–701.
(a) There is a Class A wine license in the county.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1213*

HOUSE BILL 1213
(b) (1) The license may be issued to a holder of a Class 3 winery license or
Class 4 limited winery license.
(2) A holder of a Class 4 limited winery license that applies for a Class A
wine license is exempt from any quota established by the Board concerning the number of
licenses in the election district where the winery is located.
(c) (1) The license authorizes the license holder to sell at retail at the place
described in the license wine produced at the winery that contains not more than 21% of
alcohol by volume.
(2) Wine shall be sold in a sealed package or container that may not be
opened or its contents consumed on the licensed premises.
(D) A LICENSE HOLDER MAY NOT OPERATE A SELF–CHECKOUT MACHINE ON
THE LICENSED PREMISES.
[(d)] (E) The annual license fee is $100.
13–802.
(a) There is a Class A beer and wine license.
(b) (1) The license authorizes the license holder to sell beer and wine, at retail,
at the place described in the license.
(2) The license holder shall sell the beer and wine in a sealed package or
container.
(3) The package or container may not be opened and its contents may not
be consumed on the premises where the beer or wine is sold.
(C) A LICENSE HOLDER MAY NOT OPERATE A SELF–CHECKOUT MACHINE ON
THE LICENSED PREMISES.
[(c)] (D) The annual license fee is $250.
13–901.
(a) There is a Class A beer, wine, and liquor license.
(b) (1) The license authorizes the license holder to sell beer, wine, and liquor
at retail at the place described in the license.

HOUSE BILL 1213 3
(2) The license holder shall deliver the beer, wine, or liquor in a sealed
container that may not be opened or its contents consumed on the licensed premises.
(c) A license may not be issued for any drugstore unless the applicant:
(1) has been doing business at the location applied for in the license for at
least 1 year before the date of the application for the license;
(2) is the assignee of a business established for at least 1 year before the
date of the application for the license at the location applied for; or
(3) has been engaged in the retail drug business for at least 3 years.
(D) A LICENSE HOLDER MAY NOT OPERATE A SELF–CHECKOUT MACHINE ON
THE LICENSED PREMISES.
[(d)] (E) The annual license fee is $900.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.